New Jersey, session 222, S596.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Elderly person means a person 60 years of age or older. b.    Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:43-6, an individual who commits any crime or offense against an elderly person shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment by the court.  The term of imprisonment shall include the imposition of a minimum term.  The minimum term shall be fixed at, or between, one-third to one-half of the sentence imposed, during which time the defendant shall not be eligible for parole. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.